Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1560.02
Litter fee; retailer; products subject to fee.

The fee imposed by section 81-1560.01 shall be calculated only on the gross proceeds of sales of products falling into the following categories:

(1) Food for human consumption, beverages, soft drinks, carbonated water, liquor, wine, beer, and other malt beverages, unless sold by retailers solely for consumption indoors on the retailer's premises;

(2) Food for pet consumption;

(3) Cigarettes and other tobacco products;

(4) Household paper and household paper products;

(5) Cleaning agents; and

(6) Kitchen supplies.

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 17;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 14.
October 30, 2015